Utah statutes.
20A-3-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Election day voting center" means a polling place designated by an election officer to provide for voting on election day for a person who:

(a)  is eligible to vote; and

(b)  resides within the political subdivision holding the election.

(2)  "Voting center ballot" means a regular ballot that:

(a)  is provided at an election day voting center; and

(b)  may be retrieved by the election official during the canvass if the voter cast a ballot at another location or before election day.



Enacted by Chapter 291, 2011 General Session

